Hawaii, session 2026, HB519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that twenty‑four states have legalized the possession and recreational use of cannabis.  Fifteen of those states have passed recreational cannabis as a ballot initiative. In 2024 Florida, North Dakota, and South Dakota posed the question of legalizing recreational marijuana to voters, with each initiative failing, making 2024 the only year since 2017 where no states have legalized recreational use. The legislature further finds that the legalization of recreational cannabis is a contentious issue that the people of Hawaii should have the opportunity to democratically decide. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to provide for an amendment to the Constitution of the State of Hawaii to legalize the possession and use of recreational cannabis. SECTION 2.  Article IX of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "RECREATIONAL CANNABIS Section   .  An individual in the State who is at least twenty-one years of age may possess and use cannabis; provided that the legislature shall have the power to regulate, by appropriate legislation, the possession, distribution, use, and taxation of cannabis within the State." SECTION 3.  The question to be printed on the ballot shall be as follows: "Shall the State Constitution be amended to allow individuals who are at least twenty-one years of age to possess and use cannabis and to authorize the Hawaii State Legislature to enact legislation to regulate the possession, distribution, use, and taxation of cannabis?" SECTION 4.  New constitutional material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This amendment shall take effect upon compliance with article XVII, section 3, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________